Louisiana, session 2026, HB911.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Legislative intent and history. In the 2006 Regular Session of the
Legislature, the legislature overwhelmingly adopted Act 621 to merge the courts and clerks
of court of Orleans Parish into a single reformed structure. That Act was supported by
twenty-nine Senators and ninety-six members of the House of Representatives and signed
into law by Governor Blanco. In 2012 via Act 474 the legislature repealed those provisions
before they were allowed to go into effect. The legislature recognized in Act 621, and
affirms today that:
There should be effective, efficient, and economic administration of governmental
services at all levels. It is the intent of the legislature that the public interest is best served
by the elimination, to the fullest extent practicable, of the duplication of effort within local
government in order to expend public funds more efficiently and wisely and to meet more
effectively and conveniently the needs of the people who provide the revenues for its
operations, particularly in the wake of devastation wrought by hurricanes Katrina and Rita
and in the wake of the large deficits and unprecedented financial crisis the City of New
Orleans currently faces.
It is the public policy of this state to ensure that all courts, officials, and offices
enumerated in Article V of the Louisiana Constitution of 1974 are structured in a manner
which is responsive to the needs of the people, operated efficiently, and consistent with the
funds available. The state, as well as the city of New Orleans and its citizens, now have
limited resources with which to support the number of judges and judicial offices it did
previously. The legislature finds that the structure of the judiciary in Orleans Parish is
fragmented and inefficient and must be fundamentally changed if the city/ Orleans Parish
Page 2 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
is to flourish. The costs of operating one district court and one clerk of the district court will
inherently be less due to economies of scale. The legislature recognizes that the city of New
Orleans is of economic, historical, and cultural significance to this state and to this nation
and that efficiency of its judiciary and offices comprising the judiciary is fundamental and
that the legislature should provide the best framework for its future. The consolidation of
the courts and officers covered by this Act is critical to the future financial stability of the
city and will ultimately lessen the financial burden to the citizens of the city of New Orleans
and this state. The legislature recognizes that a judicial system founded 200 years ago is
unrealistic and not viable in the 21st century. The legislature does hereby enact these
provisions in accordance with the authority granted in Section 32 of Article V of the
Louisiana Constitution of 1974.
Section 2. There are three judicial districts larger than the Parish of Orleans. The
states most populated parish and judicial district is East Baton Rouge Parish. It also has a
noticeably higher caseload than the Orleans Parish courts. The 19th Judicial District has
fifteen judges, the East Baton Rouge Family Court has four, and the East Baton Rouge
Juvenile Court has two. The state's largest parish elects the equivalent of twenty-one district
judges. It also elects four appellate court judges. The Parish of Orleans elects ten appellate
court judges and thirty-one trial court judges (Civil, Criminal, and Juvenile).
The legislature finds that there is no reason that Orleans should have more judges
than larger parishes with a higher caseload, but to facilitate transition to a proper number has
decided to make this reduction that still leaves Orleans with twenty-two judgeships which
is still the most district judgeships in the State of Louisiana. Therefore, the following
judgeships are abolished effective January 1, 2027: Divisions E and F of the Orleans
Juvenile Court, Divisions A, I, and J of the Orleans Criminal District Court, and Divisions
C, L, M, and N of the Orleans Civil District Court are abolished effective December 31,
2026. The Secretary of State shall not include those offices in the 2026 fall elections nor
authorize qualifying for those judgeships.
Section 3. The clerk of the civil district court shall become the clerk of court of
Orleans Parish. The property, employees, and duties of the clerk of the criminal district
Page 3 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
court and of the clerk of the Orleans Parish juvenile court shall be under the control of the
clerk of court of Orleans Parish effective December 31, 2026. The clerk of the criminal
district court shall be authorized to finish their current term at the same salary and maintain
responsibility for elections until the end of their term and may utilize employees of the clerk
of court for that purpose.
Section 4. R.S. 13:1, 842(A), and 1381(introductory paragraph) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 13:474.1, 477(41), 621.41 through 621.45, 714.1, 714.2, 751.1
through 751.5, 841.3, 983, and 996.62 through 996.64 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
TITLE 13. COURTS AND JUDICIAL PROCEDURE
CHAPTER 1. JUDICIAL OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES, IN GENERAL
PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS
§1. Duties of the minute clerks of courts of Orleans Parish
The minute clerks of the court of appeals and of the civil and criminal district
courts of the parish of Orleans Forty-First Judicial District Court shall attend the
sessions of the court for which they are appointed, and shall, under the supervision
of the judge or judges of the courts, keep the minutes of the court, issue all notices,
copies of rules and orders entered on the minutes, which are required to be issued,
and make due entries on the dockets of the causes and of the proceedings therein, and
shall perform such other duties as the judges may direct.
* * *
§474.1. Judicial depository
A. The bank or banks so designated as fiscal agent for such funds shall
furnish adequate security, satisfactory to the judges, to secure the return and payment
of any such deposited funds.
B. It shall be the duty of the judges to endeavor to receive interest on all
monies so deposited, and if, for any reason, the fiscal agent, or agents, so designated
are unable or unwilling to pay interest on such deposit, the judges of the district court
are hereby authorized to purchase certificates of deposit, and other forms of
Page 4 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
certificates of indebtedness bearing interest, or they may purchase short-term United
States bonds, treasury notes, or certificates.
C. Any and all interest received on all such monies so deposited, or from any
certificates of deposit, certificates of indebtedness, or United States bonds, treasury
notes, or certificates, shall be distributed in the following manner:
(1) One-half of all interest so received, as received, shall be transferred to
and shall form part of the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the Forty-First
Judicial District Court, in reimbursement and payment for the services rendered in
administering said "registry of the court" fund by the judges, clerk, and other
employees whose salaries are paid out of the fund.
(2) The ultimate recipient of any of said funds so deposited in the registry
of the court shall receive interest on such sum received by him, to be calculated on
the following basis, to wit:
(a) The rate of interest per annum to be paid such recipient shall be one-half
of the average interest rate received from the fiscal agent and/or from certificates of
deposit, certificates of indebtedness, United States government bonds, treasury notes,
or certificates, during the period that the funds being disbursed were on deposit in
the registry of the court.
(b) Interest shall be paid such recipient on the same percentage of such sum
he receives as the total amount of such registry funds invested with interest bears to
the total of such funds held in the registry of the court during the preceding year.
(c) In determining the amount of such registry funds invested with interest,
and the total of such funds held in the registry of the court, as provided in
Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph, the basis for such determination shall be the
average daily balance of the total funds invested and the average daily balances of
the total funds held in the registry of the court fund during the period that the funds
being disbursed were on deposit in the registry of the court fund.
D. In the event it becomes necessary to disburse funds which have been
deposited in the registry of the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund, in accordance
Page 5 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
with a duly rendered court order, in excess of the amount held by the fiscal agent of
the fund, in its noninterest bearing account, the presiding judge or the acting chief
judge of the Forty-First Judicial District Court, on an order issued by the majority of
the judges of the district court, sitting en banc, shall have the authority to borrow
such funds so needed for disbursal from the fiscal agent, or others, at the then
prevailing interest rate for loans of this character, using as collateral to secure any
such loan an amount of bonds, or certificates of deposit, or certificates of
indebtedness in which funds have been invested, and, if required so to do by any
such lending agency, to execute any note or other form of agreement to repay such
loan.
* * *
§477. Judicial districts
There shall be forty-one judicial districts in the state and each district shall
be composed as follows:
* * *
(41) The parish of Orleans shall compose the Forty-First District.
* * *
§621.41. Forty-First Judicial District
A.(1) The Forty-First Judicial District Court shall have twenty-one judges
and one magistrate judge.
(2) The Forty-First Judicial District Court shall have the same jurisdiction
as the district courts throughout the state, as fixed by the constitution, as provided
in this Section, or as provided by law.
B.(1) The judges of the Forty-First Judicial District Court by rule adopted
by a majority vote of the judges sitting en banc, with the consent of the judge of the
respective division, may assign certain divisions of the court to a criminal section
and certain divisions to a civil, domestic relations, or other section of the court. The
judges of the Forty-First Judicial District Court, including the magistrate judge, en
banc, shall assign certain divisions of the court to a juvenile section when the
Page 6 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
Juvenile Court of the parish of Orleans is abolished and jurisdiction of that court is
transferred to the Forty-First Judicial District Court.
(2) Notwithstanding any principal assignments to divisions, all divisions of
the court shall retain general jurisdiction to hear all matters.
C. The Forty-First Judicial District Court shall be composed of divisions A
through U and the magistrate judge over the magistrate section.
D. The judges presently presiding over Divisions A, B, and D through K of
the Civil District Court for the parish of Orleans shall preside over Divisions A
through J of the Forty-First Judicial District Court. The judges shall continue to
serve until the thirty-first day of December of the year in which their terms expire.
E. The judges presently presiding over Divisions B through H and K and L
of the Criminal District Court for the parish of Orleans shall preside over Divisions
K through Q of the Forty-First Judicial District Court. The judges shall continue to
serve until the thirty-first day of December of the year in which their terms expire.
F. The judges assigned to the juvenile section shall preside over Divisions
T and U of the Forty-First Judicial District Court.
G. The court of appeal with jurisdiction over the parish of Orleans shall have
appellate jurisdiction over all cases tried in the city courts of New Orleans and all
cases tried before the Municipal and Traffic Court of New Orleans.
H. All judges of the Forty-First Judicial District shall be elected by the
qualified electors of the parish for terms of six years at the congressional election to
be held in 2026 and every six years thereafter. Each judge shall take office on the
first day of January of the year following election and shall serve through December
thirty-first of the last year of his term. Any candidate for election to the office of
judge of this court must designate the division for which he is a candidate, and, if
elected, shall succeed to the office of judge of the division for which he was a
candidate. The judge oldest in continuous service in each division of the district
court shall preside, and in the event two or more judges shall have served the same
length of time, the judge oldest in years shall preside.
Page 7 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
I.(1) Subject to the recommendations of the committee provided for in R.S.
13:996.62, on the date that the Forty-First Judicial District Court becomes effective,
all of the books, papers, records, monies, actions, and other property of every kind
and description, movable and immovable, real and personal, possessed, controlled,
or used by the Civil District Court for the parish and Criminal District Court for the
parish shall be transferred and be owned, possessed, controlled, and used by the
Forty-First Judicial District Court.
(2) The judges of the Forty-First Judicial District, including the magistrate
judge, shall retain all accrued benefits and contributions to which they were entitled
and shall continue to contribute, if applicable, to the retirement system or pension
fund to which they were contributing on December 31, 2026. The salaries of the
judges and group health and life insurance premiums shall continue to be paid from
the same sources and in the same manner in which they were paid on December 31,
2026; however, the payment of health and life insurance premiums shall be in
accordance with the unified group health and life insurance program adopted by the
committee provided for in R.S. 13:996.62.
(3) The employees of the Civil District Court for the parish, the Criminal
District Court for the parish, and the Juvenile Court for the parish shall be transferred
in accordance with this Section, to the extent required and in accordance with
applicable civil service laws, and shall be subject to the supervision and control of
the Forty-First Judicial District Court. The employees transferred in accordance with
this Section shall continue to contribute to the retirement system or pension fund to
which they were contributing on the effective date of this Section, including the
retention of all accrued benefits and contributions to which they were entitled on the
effective date of this Section. The salaries of the employees shall continue to be paid
from the same sources and in the manner in which they are paid on December 31,
2026. The employees shall continue to be entitled to participate in the same health
and life insurance plans they are participating in on December 31, 2026.
Page 8 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
§621.42. Forty-First Judicial District; office or positions and functions
The Forty-First Judicial District Court shall have a position or office of
judicial administrator, deputy judicial administrator, and assistants as needed and
shall provide for the conduct of the jury commission and sanity hearings, the cost of
all of which shall be allocated by the Judicial Budgetary Control Council to such
court; however, the positions provided for in R.S. 13:1384 shall be paid as required
by the provisions of that Section.
§621.43. Abolition of Orleans Parish Juvenile Court; extension of terms of office;
jurisdiction; conferred on Forty-First Judicial District Court; transfer of cases
A. The Orleans Parish Juvenile Court is abolished effective December 31,
2026. The terms of office of the judges of the juvenile court now in office shall be
extended until December 31, 2026. After the effective date of this Section, no judge
shall be elected to the Orleans Parish Juvenile Court except to fill a vacancy and in
such case the term of office shall expire on December 31, 2026.
B. It is the express intent of this Section that the jurisdiction conferred by
law, particularly the Louisiana Children's Code, upon the Orleans Parish Juvenile
Court, shall be vested in the Forty-First Judicial District Court and shall be the same
as it exists on the effective date of this Section. All of its powers, its duties, and its
various departments or its personnel, except as provided in this Section, shall be
vested in the Forty-First Judicial District Court as provided in this Section and R.S.
13:621.45 and 621.46.
C. Effective January 1, 2027, all pending cases filed in the Orleans Parish
Juvenile Court are hereby transferred to the Forty-First Judicial District Court for the
parish of Orleans. All records and files of the Orleans Parish Juvenile Court shall be
transferred to the Forty-First Judicial District Court, which shall hear and dispose of
each such case with the same legal effect as if it had been instituted in that court in
the first instance.
Page 9 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
§621.44. Forty-First Judicial District Court; initial judges; term of office; election;
juvenile section
The judges of the Forty-First Judicial District Court in office on January 1,
2027, shall en banc create the Juvenile Section of that court. The rule shall designate
not less than two judges who shall be assigned all cases involving juvenile matters
over which the district court has jurisdiction.
§621.45. Implementing legislation
The legislature shall enact any such other legislation necessary to effectuate
the provisions transferring jurisdiction over juvenile matters to the Forty-First
Judicial District Court.
* * *
SUBPART D. MAGISTRATES AND COMMISSIONERS
* * *
§714.1. Magistrate Section, Forty-First Judicial District; judge; election; salary;
powers; jurisdiction
A. In addition to the judges provided for in R.S. 13:621.41(C), there shall be
one additional judgeship who shall be assigned to the Magistrate Section of the
Forty-First Judicial District Court, except as otherwise provided for in this Section.
The judge shall be known as the magistrate and shall preside over the Magistrate
Section. The magistrate shall receive the same salary, payable in the same manner,
as the state pays to the other judges of the Forty-First Judicial District Court. The
magistrate shall be elected at the same time, shall take office at the same time, and
shall serve for the same term of office as the other judges of the Forty-First Judicial
District Court. The magistrate shall be a member of the court sitting en banc.
B. The magistrate shall have and possess all of the powers, duties,
jurisdiction, rights, prerogatives, and qualifications as are now prescribed by the
constitution and laws of this state relative to judges of the Forty-First Judicial
District Court, except as provided herein.
Page 10 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
C. The magistrate shall have jurisdiction to act as committing magistrate in
felony and misdemeanor charges and to hold preliminary examinations, with the
authority to bail or discharge, or to hold for trial, in all cases before the Forty-First
Judicial District Court, and shall have the power to adopt all necessary rules with
respect thereto.
D. The magistrate shall hear preliminary motions, conduct extradition
hearings, accept pleas in misdemeanor cases, hear and render judgments in other
matters, including misdemeanor cases, preliminary to the trial on the merits, conduct
trials of misdemeanor cases, preside over jury trials of misdemeanor cases, and sign
and issue search and arrest warrants upon probable cause being shown in accordance
with law. The magistrate shall have the right to appoint a court reporter, deputy
court reporter, and minute clerk as provided by law, and the sheriff for the parish
shall appoint a crier and deputy sheriff for the section of the court created herein as
provided by law.
E. The Forty-First Judicial District Court, including the magistrate of the
Magistrate Section of said court, acting en banc, shall prescribe rules and procedures
not inconsistent with the constitution and laws of this state to be followed in all
matters to be presented before the Magistrate Section.
§714.2. Commissioners; Magistrate Section; Forty-First Judicial District Court
A.(1) There shall be up to two commissioners appointed to the Magistrate
Section of the Forty-First Judicial District Court. The persons appointed to the
offices of commissioner created by this Section shall be known as commissioners
and shall not be judges, but shall have the same qualifications, powers, duties,
jurisdiction, and functions, all as is now or hereafter provided for the judge in the
Magistrate Section of the Forty-First Judicial District Court. The commissioners
shall serve a term of six years.
(2) The salary of the commissioners of the Forty-First Judicial District Court
for the parish shall be fifty-five percent of the salary paid to a judge of the
Forty-First Judicial District Court, said salary and related benefits as provided for by
Page 11 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
law, to be payable in the same manner and from the same sources as the salary and
benefits of a judge of the Forty-First Judicial District Court. The support services
and personnel including minute clerks and stenographers, as shall be necessary for
the offices of commissioner, and such supporting services and personnel shall be
paid in the same amount and from the same source as they are paid on December 31,
2026.
(3) The judges of the Forty-First Judicial District Court, sitting en banc, shall
determine the further powers, duties, functions, and policy affecting the offices of
commissioner, not inconsistent with the provisions of this Section.
B. Should there be a vacancy created by the removal, resignation, or death
of any commissioner, the judges of the district court, sitting en banc, shall fill the
vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term. At the termination of the initial
term and any subsequent terms of a commissioner, said judges, sitting en banc, shall
appoint successors to the office for like terms. All commissioners are subject to
removal for any reason for which a judge of the Forty-First Judicial District Court
may be removed from office. Such removal shall be by order of the judges sitting
en banc, after notice and hearing. No person shall serve as commissioner unless he
has practiced law in the state of Louisiana for a period of not less than five years.
C. No commissioner of the magistrate office shall practice law before the
Forty-First Judicial District Court.
* * *
SUBPART B. CLERKS
* * *
§751.1. Clerk of the Forty-First Judicial District Court
A. There shall be one clerk of the Forty-First Judicial District Court who
shall be elected by the qualified electors of Orleans Parish. He shall be elected at the
election for parochial and municipal officers in Orleans Parish, shall serve for a term
of four years, and shall take office and begin his term on the first Monday in May
following election. The clerk shall be called the clerk of court of the Forty-First
Page 12 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
Judicial District Court. No separate clerk of the Civil District Court for the parish
of Orleans and no separate clerk of the Criminal District Court for the parish of
Orleans shall be elected after their current term of office expires. At the expiration
of the current term of the Clerk of the Criminal District Court, the separate offices
of the clerk of the Civil District Court for the parish of Orleans, the clerk of court of
the Criminal District Court for the parish of Orleans, and the clerk of court of the
Juvenile Court for the parish of Orleans shall be abolished and the functions, duties,
and responsibilities of their respective offices shall be merged and consolidated
within the office of the clerk of court of the Forty-First Judicial District Court.
C. All of the books, papers, records, monies, actions, and other property of
every kind and description, movable and immovable, real and personal, possessed,
controlled, or used by the clerk of the Civil District Court for the parish of Orleans
and the clerk of the Criminal District Court for the parish of Orleans shall be
transferred and be owned, possessed, controlled, and used by the clerk of the
Forty-First Judicial District Court.
D. The employees of the clerk of the Civil District Court for the parish of
Orleans, the clerk of the Criminal District Court for the parish of Orleans, and the
Juvenile Court of the parish of Orleans shall be transferred in accordance with this
Section, to the extent required and in accordance with applicable civil service laws
and rules, and shall be subject to the supervision and control of the clerk of the
Forty-First Judicial District Court. The employees transferred in accordance with this
Section shall continue to contribute to the retirement system or pension fund to
which they were contributing on the effective date of this Section, including the
retention of all accrued benefits and contributions to which they were entitled on the
effective date of this Section. The salaries of the employees of the clerk of Civil
District Court and the clerk of Criminal District Court shall continue to be paid from
the same sources and in the manner in which they were paid on the effective date of
this Section.
§751.2. Salary
Page 13 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
The provisions of R.S. 13:782 shall apply to the clerk of the Forty-First
Judicial District Court except as otherwise provided therein and he shall receive a
salary as established in R.S. 13:782(A) based on the applicable population of the
parish according to the latest United States census which shall be payable out of the
Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund.
§751.3. Expenses
In addition to his salary, the clerk of the Forty-First Judicial District Court
shall receive a sum not to exceed ten percent of his annual salary as an expense
allowance. This allowance shall be payable out of the expense fund or its successor
upon the warrant of the clerk.
§751.4. Clerk’s salary fund
Except as provided in R.S. 13:783(C), the clerk of the Forty-First Judicial
District Court shall collect all fees and charges due his office and deposit them in a
fund known as the Clerk’s Salary Fund. The clerk shall keep an accurate set of
books in connection with this fund showing all receipts of his office, including
notarial fees, and all expenditures. On or before the tenth of October each year, he
shall render a statement from the books for the fiscal year beginning July first and
ending June thirtieth to the governing body of the parish. A clerk who fails to
comply with this Section shall forfeit to the parish fifty percent of the compensation
received by him under R.S. 13:782.
§751.5. Cross-references
The provisions of R.S. 13:750 and 750.1 shall apply in Orleans Parish.
* * *
SUBPART C. FEES
* * *
§841.3. Fees; clerk for the Forty-First Judicial District; collection
The clerk of the Forty-First Judicial District Court shall collect the fees set
forth in R.S. 13:1213, 1213.1, 1381, 1595.3, 2157, and any other fees required by
statute to be paid to or collected by the clerks of the Civil District Court for the
Page 14 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
parish of Orleans, the Criminal District Court for the parish of Orleans, the Juvenile
Court for the parish of Orleans, or the First or Second City Court of the City of New
Orleans and shall deposit no less than fifty percent of the amounts collected in the
Clerk's Operational Fund. The remaining funds shall be deposited in the
Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund.
* * *
§842. Advance costs
A. The clerks of the district courts shall demand and receive from the
plaintiff or plaintiffs in each ordinary suit, whether accompanied by conservatory
writs or not, not less than twenty dollars or such other amount as may be fixed by
law for advanced costs, to be disbursed to the clerk's salary fund or to others as their
fees accrue. Whenever the costs have exhausted the amount of the original advance
deposit, the clerk may refuse to perform any further function in the proceeding until
the additional costs for the function have been paid, in accordance with the fees set
forth in R.S. 13:841 or, in Orleans Parish , the Forty-First Judicial District Court as
set forth in R.S. 13:841.3 or, in R.S. 13:1213.
* * *
§983. Court reporters for the Forty-First Judicial District Court
A.(1) Each judge of the Forty-First Judicial District may appoint no more
than two court reporters for his division, which reporters shall hold office until it is
declared vacated by the judge making such appointment.
(2) The judges of the Forty-First Judicial District, sitting en banc and with
approval of the governing authority of the parish, may appoint additional qualified
court reporters as they deem necessary, who shall serve at the pleasure of the court
en banc and may be assigned to the various divisions of the court, or to the grand
jury, as the court en banc may direct.
B. Each court reporter appointed under the provisions of this Section shall
be required to take an oath of office and furnish bond for the faithful performance
of the duties of the office. The bond shall be in favor of the judges of the Forty-First
Page 15 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
Judicial District Court for the purpose of protecting litigants against any acts of
incompetence or neglect of duty by the court reporter. The bond shall be recorded
and filed in the office of the clerk of court. Any party litigant shall have the right to
sue on said bond for any damages sustained through any wrongful act or neglect of
duty by the court reporter in the performance of his duties as official court reporter.
C. The court reporters shall report in shorthand, stenotype, by recording
machine, or in any recognized manner, and transcribe into longhand by typing or
printing all the testimony taken in all civil appealable cases and shall furnish for the
purposes of appeal the necessary copies of the testimony required by law.
D. The court reporters shall work concurrently under the direction and
supervision of the judges appointing them, according to the needs of the judicial
district, in the interest of expediting the business before the court.
E. Each court reporter shall perform secretarial duties for the district judge
appointing the reporter, particularly in the absence of the judge's regular secretary.
F. The court reporters shall receive a monthly salary to be fixed and
determined by the judges of the Forty-First Judicial District sitting en banc, upon
approval of the governing authority of the parish. The salaries shall be paid out of
the general fund of the parish. The governing authority for the parish shall budget
the salaries in its budget of annual expenses. Upon approval by the court, a portion
thereof may be paid out of the Consolidated Expense Fund for the Forty-First
Judicial District.
G.(1)(a) In all civil cases, a fee of one dollar and fifty cents per original page
of transcript, fifty cents per page for additional pages of original transcript for the
first copy, and thirty-five cents per page for additional copies reported and
transcribed beyond the first copy shall be charged by and paid to the court reporter
for reports and for transcribing the testimony which shall be retained by him as
compensation in addition to the salary as provided herein, and shall be taxed as costs
of the suit in which the testimony is taken to be collected by the clerk of court,
except in pauper cases.
Page 16 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
(b) Payment of the fees shall be made primarily by the appellant immediately
upon the transcription of the evidence, and the court reporter shall not be required
to file the transcript with the clerk of court before payment.
(2) Should the appellant fail or refuse to make such payment, the appellee
or any other party to the suit may make the same and have it assessed as costs.
(3) Even though counsel may attempt to procure a transcript of the entire
record by alleging that the entire record is necessary to support a motion for a new
trial, the trial judge shall not order the entire transcript to be typed unless he deems
it indispensable to the record of the motion or proceedings.
H.(1)(a) In all pauper cases under Code of Civil Procedure Article 5181 et
seq., the governing authority for the parish shall pay to the court reporter for the
transcribing of testimony, when an appeal is taken or upon order of the judge,
one-half of the amount as would otherwise be required to be paid by the party who
is proceeding in forma pauperis.
(b) Such amount shall be paid at the time the transcription is filed, but only
upon the written approval and order of the judge.
(c) Such payments by the parish shall not exceed the sum of twenty-five
hundred dollars for any one year.
(2) The governing authority of the parish, upon making payment to any court
reporter pursuant to this Section shall be legally subrogated to the rights of the court
reporter as to all sums so paid for the transcription of testimony in pauper cases.
(3) All judgments in cases in which the pauper shall be cast for costs,
together with the statement of such costs, shall be recorded by the clerk of court in
the mortgage records of the parish and such judgments when so recorded shall
operate as judicial mortgages in favor of the parish governing authority.
I.(1) The court reporters shall record such criminal proceedings as may be
required by law or as ordered by the court.
(2)(a) No fee shall be charged for taking evidence on assignments of error,
motions, or other pleadings in criminal cases, unless approved by the presiding
judge.
Page 17 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
(b) When so approved, any such payment may be made from the
Consolidated Expense Fund for the Forty-First Judicial District when the defendant
is indigent and judges sitting en banc have approved the payment.
(c) In such cases, however, only properly designated portions of the record
shall be transcribed.
J. The court reporters shall be provided with any office supplies necessary
for the reporting and transcription of any notes of evidence taken by the court
reporters. Each court reporter shall be responsible for all traveling expenses and
other expenses incurred in the discharge of his duties.
K. In criminal cases, the notes shall be maintained indefinitely and shall be
returned to the appropriate court upon termination of employment. In other matters,
the court reporters shall file and maintain their notes for a period of one year after
judgment has become final.
L. The clerk of court shall collect from every person filing any civil suit or
proceeding, and who is not otherwise exempted by law from the payment of court
costs, a sum to be determined by the judges of the district, sitting en banc, which sum
shall not exceed fifteen dollars, subject, however, to the provisions of Code of Civil
Procedure Article 5181 et seq.
M.(1) The additional cost of fourteen dollars may be taxed against every
nonindigent defendant who is convicted after trial or after a plea of guilty or who
forfeits his bond in connection with any other criminal offense.
(2) All funds received pursuant to this Section shall be used to pay court
reporter fees for transcripts prepared for indigent defendants, including bills of
exceptions, trials, motions, hearings on writs, and all court proceedings.
(3) The judges of the Forty-First Judicial District Court, sitting en banc, may,
by a majority vote of all members, authorize the payment of fees, to be determined
by the court, to the deputy court reporters for the transcription of indigent defendant
cases.
* * *
Page 18 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
§996.62. Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the Forty-First Judicial District
A.(1) Effective January 1, 2027, there is hereby created a fund for the Forty-
First Judicial District Court, the juvenile court for the parish of Orleans, and the First
and Second City Courts of the city of New Orleans which shall be known as the
“Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund.” As used in this Section, “judges” means the
judges of the courts enumerated in this Subsection.
(2) There is hereby created a committee of the following judges: three judges
from the civil district court who shall be the chief judge and two of his designees,
three judges from the criminal district court, including the magistrate judge, who
shall be the chief judge and two of his designees, one judge from the juvenile court
for the parish of Orleans with the most seniority, and one judge from the first or
second city court with the most seniority. The chairman of the committee shall be
elected by majority vote and serve for one year on a rotating basis among each court.
(3) Beginning on January 1, 2027, the committee designated in Paragraph (2)
of this Subsection shall:
(a) Review all funds and funding sources for the courts enumerated in this
Subsection.
(b) Have an audit conducted by an independent certified public account of all
monies, deposits and accounts possessed, controlled, exercised, or used by a court
or judge.
(c) Identify all obligations and debts of the courts enumerated in this
Subsection.
(d) Recommend appropriate funding levels and the sources for such funding
for the courts.
(e) Recommend the appropriate method for consolidating all funds, monies,
deposits, accounts, obligations and debts of the enumerated courts into the
Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund.
(4) The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the
Senate Committee on Judiciary A and the House Committee on Judiciary not later
than January 1, 2028.
Page 19 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
B.(1) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, effective January 1,
2029, all monies, deposits, accounts heretofore possessed, controlled, exercised, or
used by a court or judge separately or collectively, enumerated in Subsection A of
this Section shall be transferred to the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund, in
accordance with the recommendations of the Consolidation Review Committee, and
monies so allocated to the fund shall be continued to be paid from the same sources
as provided therein into a special account designated as the Consolidated Judicial
Expense Fund.
(2) This Section shall not apply to those funds collected pursuant to R.S.
13:1141(A) and R.S. 13:1381.1.
(3) The judges shall cause to be conducted annually an audit of the fund and
the books and accounts relating thereto, and shall file the same with the office of the
legislative auditor where it shall be available for public inspection.
(4) The monies in the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund may be used for
any purpose connected with, incidental to, or related to the proper administration or
function of the courts and judges designated in Subsection A of this Section or the
offices of the judges thereof and is in addition to any and all other funds, salaries,
expenses, or other monies that are provided, authorized, or established by law. The
establishment of the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund in no way relieves or
extinguishes any obligation of the city of New Orleans to fund the court system.
(5) The judges, en banc, may further appoint such secretarial, clerical,
research, administrative, or other personnel as they deem necessary to expedite the
business and function of the court and fix and pay all or any part of the salaries of
such personnel out of the monies in the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund. In like
manner, the judges, en banc, may utilize the monies in the Consolidated Judicial
Expense Fund to pay all or any part of the cost of establishing or maintaining, or
both, a law library for the court, or for buying or maintaining, or both, any type of
equipment, supplies, or other items consistent with or germane to the efficient
operation of the court. In general, the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund is
established and may be used for any purpose or purposes connected with, incidental
Page 20 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
to, or related to the proper administration or function of the said court or the offices
of the individual judges and is in addition to any and all other funds, salaries,
expenses, or other monies that are now or hereafter provided, authorized, or
established by law for any of the aforesaid purposes.
C.(1) The judges, en banc, may utilize the monies in the Judicial Expense
Fund to pay all or any part of the cost of planning, designing, and constructing a new
courthouse for the parish, which may house the following courts and all related
support offices:
(a) District court for the parish.
(b) City courts.
(c) Juvenile courts.
(2) Any contract for the planning, designing, or construction of a new
courthouse shall be subject to the public bid laws. The provisions of this Subsection
shall not affect the obligation of the city of New Orleans to provide buildings to
house the Civil District Court and the other courts housed therein and the Criminal
District Court.
D. The legislature hereby specifically states that this Section is in no way
and to no extent intended to nor shall it be construed in any manner which will
impair the contractual or other obligations of any fund transferred by this Subpart or
of the state of Louisiana. It is hereby specifically provided that all obligations of any
fund transferred in accordance with this Subpart hereafter shall be deemed to be the
obligations of the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the Forty-First Judicial
District to which the fund is transferred to the same extent as if originally made by
said fund. This transfer of obligations shall in no way create a personal obligation
for any judge of the Forty-First Judicial District Court, if no such obligation existed
prior to the transfer. In like manner, and in order to prevent any violation of the
provisions, terms, or conditions of any gift, donation, deed, will, trust, or other
instrument or disposition by which property of any kind has been vested in a fund
transferred by this Section, or diversion from the purposes for which such property
was thus vested in any fund, it is hereby specifically provided that each such
Page 21 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
instrument or disposition hereafter shall be deemed to have been vested in the
Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the Forty-First Judicial District to which the
fund is transferred in the same manner and to the same extent as if originally so
done.
E. The Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the Forty-First Judicial
District to which each fund is transferred shall be the successor in every way to each
fund transferred and from which functions are or may be merged and consolidated,
including all of the obligations and debts of each fund. In like manner, all other
dedications and allocations of revenues and sources of revenues heretofore made,
which are constitutional under the Constitution of Louisiana of 1974, shall continue,
until otherwise hereafter provided by the constitution, in the same manner, to the
same extent, and for the same purposes as were provided prior to the enactment of
this Section.
F. The provisions of this Section shall not be construed or applied in any way
which will prevent full compliance by the state, or any department, office, or agency
thereof, with the requirements of any Act of the Congress of the United States or any
regulation made thereunder by which federal aid or other federal assistance has been
or hereafter is made available to this state, or any department, office, agency, or
subdivision thereof, anything contained in this Subpart to the contrary
notwithstanding, and such compliance hereafter shall be insofar as such compliance
affects any fund transferred in accordance with the provisions of this Section.
G. Upon the transfer of each fund in accordance with this Section, any
pending or unfinished business of each such fund shall be taken over and be
completed by the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund for the Forty-First Judicial
District with the same power and authority as that of the fund transferred. The
Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund shall be the successor in every way to each
fund, and every act done by the Consolidated Judicial Expense Fund in the exercise
of the functions of each shall be deemed to have the same force and effect under any
Page 22 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
provisions of the constitution and laws in effect on the effective date of this Section
as if done by the fund transferred.
* * *
§1381. Fees
The following charges may be made for the services of the clerk of the
criminal district court Forty-First Judicial District Court:
* * *
Section 5. Except as expressly otherwise provided in this Act, the term "clerk of
court" shall mean the clerk of the Civil District Court for the parish of Orleans, until such
time as the clerk of the Forty-First Judicial District Court has been elected and takes office,
after which time references to the clerk of court shall mean the clerk of the Forty-First
Judicial District Court.
Section 6. The city of New Orleans shall continue to provide quarters for the conduct
of the functions of the offices transferred to the clerk of court as provided in this Act in the
city of New Orleans in the building in which the Civil Section of the Forty-First Judicial
District Court holds court or other quarters contiguous thereto which shall be good and
sufficient for the proper and efficient operation of the recordation of records and documents,
including the installation and maintenance of appropriate fire protection and climate control
systems.
Section 7. All books, papers, records, money, actions, and other property of every
kind and description, movable and immovable, real and personal, possessed, controlled, or
used by each office transferred to the clerk of court by this Act shall be transferred with each
office to the office of the clerk of court as the parish recorder and shall continue to be
controlled and used by each office so transferred until the respective office is abolished as
provided in this Act.
Section 8. The legislature hereby specifically states that this Act is in no way and
to no extent intended to nor shall it be construed in any manner which will impair the
contractual or other obligations of any office transferred by this Act.
Section 9. This Act shall not be construed or applied in any way which will prevent
full compliance with the requirements of any Act of Congress of the United States or any
Page 23 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
regulation made thereunder by which federal aid or other federal assistance has been or
hereafter is made available.
Section 10. Any legal proceeding to which any office transferred to the clerk of court
in accordance with the provisions of this Act is a party and which is filed, initiated, or
otherwise pending before any court on the effective date of such transfer, and all documents
involved in or affected by any such legal proceeding, shall retain their effectiveness and shall
be continued in the name of the office so transferred. All further legal proceedings and
documents in the continuation, disposition, and enforcement of said legal proceeding shall
be applicable to the office of clerk of court as the parish recorder without the necessity for
amendment of any document.
Section 11.(A) R.S. 13:1031 through 1147, 1271 through 1312, 1335 through 1347,
1381.1 through 1400, 1566 through 1568.3, 1587.1 through 1587.2, and 1593 through 1595.3
are hereby repealed in their entirety effective on January 1, 2027.
(B) R.S. 13:1211 through 1212.1, 1371, and 1372 are hereby repealed in their
entirety on the date that the clerk of the Forty-First Judicial District Court takes office.
Section 12. This Section and Sections 4 through 18 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration
of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article
III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the governor and
subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section, Sections 4 through
18, of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
Section 13. The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective on
January 1, 2027, except that the provisions of R.S. 13:621.41 and 714.1 shall be effective
for purposes of qualifying and election of judges and magistrate of the Forty-First Judicial
District Court to be held at the congressional election to be held in 2026.
Section 14. All fees and costs assessed or collected by the clerk of the Civil District
Court or the clerk of the Criminal District Court, for the parish of Orleans in effect on the
effective date of this Section are continued and shall be assessed and collected in accordance
with the provisions of law then in effect.
Page 24 of 26
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1258 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 911
Section 15. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to renumber and
rearrange any sections or parts of Sections of this Act and make any such changes to
references to other provisions of law consistent with the provisions of this Act. The
Louisiana State Law Institute is also directed to submit such recommendations on or before
March 1, 2027, as it deems necessary to clarify, modify, or repeal any of the provisions of
this Act or any other provision of law, including the elimination of antiquated provisions
consistent with the provisions of the Act.
Section 16. If a vacancy occurs before December 31, 2026, in a division of civil or
criminal court as specified in Section 2 of this Act to be abolished or in the office of the
clerk of the criminal district court, no special election shall be held to fill the vacancy. In
the case of the clerks of the civil and criminal district courts, the chief deputy of either office
shall fill the unexpired term.